West Virginia, session 2025, HB2091.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: BERKELEY COUNTY REFERENDUM ELECTION TO CHANGE TERMS OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS. §1. County commission directed to hold a referendum election at the next general election to change the term of office for county commissioners from six years to four years. The County Commission of Berkeley County is hereby directed and empowered to hold a referendum election at the next general election for the purpose of changing the terms of office for county commissioners from six years to four years.